src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
Affix file for Kven adjectives

# The base lexica

Each a_ lexicon gets the +A tag and is then redirected to
a common x_ lexicon in the noun file, while compar and superl are here.

long_par        ;

* LEXICON vanha_nocomp_a_21  

* LEXICON a_11_i   siisti

* LEXICON a_11   hieno, tuttu, syyry

* LEXICON a_11_E2I  moni, umpi, pälvi 

* LEXICON a_11_ae   väärä, nöyrä

* LEXICON a_21	  liberaali !TODO: selvittää kannattaako siirtää osa sanoista toiseen ryhmään vai muuttaa tämän ryhmän nimen 

* LEXICON a_21_odd	 loistaava 

* LEXICON a_21_odd_AO   latuska 

* LEXICON a_31  = pää

* LEXICON a_31_ee	  pimmee, valkkee, kauhhee, hoppee ! TODO sort out nouns and adjectives

* LEXICON a_31_ii   auttii

* LEXICON a_31_uu   liehmuu

* LEXICON vanha_a_23ea	 pimeä. Is Jok verson of vanha_a_23, never called from stems/adjectives.lexc

* LEXICON a_12	  pieni

* LEXICON a_12_si	 uusi. uussiin only por, always one s in Var

* LEXICON a_22  tyven

* LEXICON vanha_a_32m  irtain

* LEXICON a_22_ma  vasen sg taipuu kuitenki -ma, lämmin:lämpi

* LEXICON a_32_as  raskas

* LEXICON a_32_aes  raskas

* LEXICON a_32_vaka  raskas

* LEXICON a_32_paras  vain sannaa paras varten

* LEXICON vanha_a_33aes  sinnikäs

* LEXICON a_32_is  valmis, kaunis

* LEXICON a_32_kärys  kärys, so far this is the only word

* LEXICON a_32_sees  sees, so far this is the only word

* LEXICON a_32_et  tuoret

* LEXICON a_32_u  vaipunu:vaipun ! perfect participle

* LEXICON a_32_väsynyt  väsyny:väsyn, so far this is the only word ! perfect participle

* LEXICON a_32_nny  hengistynny:hengistyn

* LEXICON a_32_nnu  ravistunnu:ravistun

* LEXICON a_32_lly  käsitelly:käsitel

* LEXICON a_32_llu  tervettullu:tervet#tul

* LEXICON a_22_excns  = veres

* LEXICON a_22_excns_even  = sees

* LEXICON a_22_excns_mus  = isomus

* LEXICON a_22_inen  varovainen

* LEXICON a_22_inen_odd  sininen

LEXICON MATON  ! TODO TODO TODO ajattelemattomalle lle lla nna

* LEXICON a_22_ton_even  muuttumaton

* LEXICON a_22_ton_odd  onneton

LEXICON MATONodd  ! käymättömäle le la na ! TODO Probably not in use atm

* LEXICON x_22_ton  onneton

* LEXICON x_22_ton_yksi_t  alaston yhelä -t:läm alastoman

# Basic paradigms

Most cases are directed to affixes/nouns.lexc

## Lexica for the non-uniform cases

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fkv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>
